Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1476.01
Lottery contractor; contributions and expenditures prohibited; penalty.

(1) A person who is awarded a contract by the Director of the Lottery Division as a lottery contractor for a major procurement as defined in section 9-803 may not make a contribution to or an independent expenditure for a candidate for a state elective office during the term of the contract or for three years following the most recent award or renewal of the contract.

(2) A person shall be considered to have made a contribution or independent expenditure if the contribution or independent expenditure is made by the person, by an officer of the person, by a separate segregated political fund established and administered by the person as provided in sections 49-1469 to 49-1469.08, or by anyone acting on behalf of the person, officer, or fund.

(3) A person who knowingly or intentionally violates this section shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1995, LB 28, § 5;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 49-1469.02;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 26.